Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.088

[Art. 13] Punishment prohibited before trial.

Subject to RCW 38.38.488, no person, while being held for trial or the result of trial, may be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against the person, nor shall the arrest or confinement imposed upon the person be any more rigorous than the circumstances require to insure his or her presence, but the person may be subjected to minor punishment during that period for infractions of discipline.

[ 1989 c 48 s 13; 1963 c 220 s 13.]